Utah statutes.
58-3a-302.    Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each applicant for licensure as an
architect shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;
(d)  have graduated and received an earned bachelors or masters degree from an
architecture program meeting criteria established by rule by the division in
collaboration with the board;
(e)  have successfully completed a program of diversified practical experience
established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board;
(f)  have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division
in collaboration with the board; and
(g)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for
the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for license.
(2)  Each applicant for licensure as an architect by endorsement shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;
(d)  submit satisfactory evidence of:
(i)  current licensure in good standing in a jurisdiction recognized by rule
by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(ii)  current certification from the National Council of Architectural
Registration Boards; or
(iii)  current license in good standing in a jurisdiction recognized by rule
by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(iv)  full-time employment as a licensed architect as a principal for at least
five of the last seven years immediately preceding the date of the
application;
(e)  have successfully passed any examination established by rule by the
division in collaboration with the board; and
(f)  meet with the board or representative of the division upon request for
the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for license.
